Utah statutes.
51-9-305.    Crediting of certain severance tax revenues to the permanent
state trust fund.
(1) (a)  After making the distributions of oil and gas severance tax revenues
as required under Sections 59-5-116 and 59-5-119, the Division of Finance
shall make the distributions required under Subsections (2) through (5).
(b)  For purposes of this section, revenue collected from severance taxes on
oil and gas imposed under Title 59, Chapter 5, Severance Tax on Oil, Gas, and
Mining, does not include revenue that is distributed under Section 59-5-116 or
59-5-119.
(2)  Beginning with fiscal year 2008-09, if authorized by law, the Division of
Finance shall credit to the permanent state trust fund all revenue collected
in a fiscal year from severance taxes on oil and gas imposed under Title 59,
Chapter 5, Severance Tax on Oil, Gas, and Mining, that exceed $71,000,000.
(3)  Beginning with fiscal year 2008-09, if authorized by law, the Division of
Finance shall credit to the permanent state trust fund all revenue collected
in a fiscal year from severance taxes on mining imposed under Title 59,
Chapter 5, Severance Tax on Oil, Gas, and Mining, that exceed $27,600,000.
(4)  The state treasurer shall invest and separately account for the earnings
on funds that are deposited into the permanent state trust fund under this
section.
(5) (a)  In accordance with Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4, the
interest and dividends earned annually on revenue from severance taxes that
are deposited into the permanent state trust fund shall be deposited in the
General Fund.
(b)  Interest and dividends earned on revenue from severance taxes that are
deposited in the General Fund pursuant to Subsection (5)(a) shall be credited
to the Infrastructure and Economic Diversification Investment Account created
in Section 51-9-303.
